Tennessee, session 114, HB1182.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-1-408, is amended by deleting
subsection (c) and substituting instead:
(c) Each department and agency shall annually report progress in achieving
economic efficiency during their budget hearings to the appropriate committees of the
senate and house of representatives, and post such report to the department's or
agency's website.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1182
003350
- 1 -